Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [124D.1141] PLANT-BASED SCHOOL MEAL OPTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Plant-based meal option" means a meal that does not include animal products of any kind, including meat, poultry, fish, dairy, or eggs. This definition encompasses all meal components, including a fluid milk. The meal may include food derived from plants, including but not limited to fruits, vegetables, grains, nuts, seeds, legumes, and plant-based products approved for kindergarten through grade 12 food service, ensuring a balanced and nutritionally adequate option. new text end new text begin (c) "School nutrition teams" means the staff and administrators responsible for meal planning, preparation, and service within a school or district, including but not limited to nutritionists, dietitians, cooks, food service providers, and food service managers. new text end new text begin (d) "Upon prior request" means a request in writing, made by or on behalf of a student for a plant-based meal option, submitted to the school nutrition team. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Plant-based meal option requirement, new text end new text begin (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school, including charter schools, within Minnesota that participates in the National School Lunch Program must offer at least one plant-based meal option daily as part of the regular lunch food service offerings to students upon prior request. new text end new text begin (b) School nutrition teams must provide at least one plant-based meal option daily as part of the regular food service offerings to students who submit a prior request within four weeks of the receipt of the request. new text end new text begin (c) Schools must make information regarding the availability of plant-based meal options and the process for making a request readily available to students, parents, and guardians in a manner that is accessible and comprehensible. new text end new text begin (d) All plant-based meal options must comply with federal nutrition guidelines for school food to ensure the meals meet the dietary needs of students. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Implementation. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Education must develop and provide guidelines to assist schools in implementing the plant-based meal option requirement, including but not limited to resources for developing plant-based meal options, training for school nutrition teams, and strategies for efficiently managing requests. new text end new text begin (b) The department must monitor compliance with this section and may take appropriate actions against schools that fail to comply, as determined by the commissioner of education. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin Each public school must report annually to the department, in the form and manner determined by the commissioner, on the implementation of this section, including the number of plant-based meal options offered, the number of requests received and fulfilled, and any challenges encountered in the implementation process. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to meals served on or after the first day of the 2026-2027 school year. new text end